Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2339
Requirement that devisee survive testator by one hundred twenty hours.

A devisee who does not survive the testator by one hundred twenty hours is treated as if he predeceased the testator, unless the will of the testator contains some language dealing explicitly with simultaneous deaths or deaths in a common disaster, or requiring that the devisee survive the testator or survive the testator for a stated period in order to take under the will.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 61, UPC § 2-601.